Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 9. Waste.

Collateral references. —

78 Am. Jur. 2d, Waste, § 1 et seq.

93 C.J.S., Waste, § 1 et seq.

Rights and remedies of owner or lessee of oil or gas land or mineral or royalty interest therein, in respect of waste of oil or gas through operations on other lands, 4 ALR2d 198.

Relief against cotenant for rents and profits or use in occupation as an incident of or adjustment in partition, 51 ALR2d 454.

Measure of damages in landlord’s action for waste against tenant, 82 ALR2d 1106.

Forfeiture of life estate for waste, 16 ALR3d 1344.

What constitutes waste justifying appointment of receiver of mortgaged property, 55 ALR3d 1041.

Right of contingent remainderman to maintain action for damages for waste, 56 ALR3d 677.

Sec. 09.45.740.
Right of action for waste.

If a guardian, tenant for life or years, or tenant in common of real property commits waste on the property, a person injured by the waste may bring an action for damages for the injury.
In an action for waste there may be judgment for treble damages.
Where the plaintiff has a reversionary interest and the injury due to waste equals or exceeds the value of the interest held by the one committing the waste, or the waste is committed with malice, judgment may be for forfeiture of the estate and eviction.

History.

(§ 29.01 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Secs. 09.45.750 — 09.45.790.
[Renumbered as AS 09.45.900 — 09.45.940.]

Sec. 09.45.795.
[Renumbered as AS 09.65.200.]

Sec. 09.45.797.
[Renumbered as AS 09.65.220.]